Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article V. Executive.

§ 1. Executive power; Governor’s term of office.

The chief executive power of the Commonwealth shall be vested in a Governor. He shall hold office for a term commencing upon his inauguration on the Saturday after the second Wednesday in January, next succeeding his election, and ending in the fourth year thereafter immediately upon the inauguration of his successor. He shall be ineligible to the same office for the term next succeeding that for which he was elected, and to any other office during his term of service.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions relating to the term of office of the Governor, see §

24.2-210

.

Proposed amendment not agreed to by General Assembly. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1985 Session (Acts 1985, c. 590), and referred to the 1986 Session. At the 1986 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Law Review.

For survey of constitutional law in Virginia for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1389 (1976).

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
9A M.J. Governor, § 3;
17 M.J. State, § 9.

§ 2. Election of Governor.

The Governor shall be elected by the qualified voters of the Commonwealth at the time and place of choosing members of the General Assembly. Returns of the election shall be transmitted, under seal, by the proper officers, to the State Board of Elections, or such other officer or agency as may be designated by law, which shall cause the returns to be opened and the votes to be counted in the manner prescribed by law. The person having the highest number of votes shall be declared elected; but if two or more shall have the highest and an equal number of votes, one of them shall be chosen Governor by a majority of the total membership of the General Assembly. Contested elections for Governor shall be decided by a like vote. The mode of proceeding in such cases shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references.

As to election of Governor, and contest of such election, see §§

24.2-210

,

24.2-804

.

§ 3. Qualifications of Governor.

No person except a citizen of the United States shall be eligible to the office of Governor; nor shall any person be eligible to that office unless he shall have attained the age of thirty years and have been a resident of the Commonwealth and a registered voter in the Commonwealth for five years next preceding his election.

§ 4. Place of residence and compensation of Governor.

The Governor shall reside at the seat of government. He shall receive for his services a compensation to be prescribed by law, which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the period for which he shall have been elected. While in office he shall receive no other emolument from this or any other government.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions concerning salaries of Governor and other officers, see §

2.2-100

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
9A M.J. Governor, § 3.

§ 5. Legislative responsibilities of Governor.

The Governor shall communicate to the General Assembly, at every regular session, the condition of the Commonwealth, recommend to its consideration such measures as he may deem expedient, and convene the General Assembly on application of two thirds of the members elected to each house thereof, or when, in his opinion, the interest of the Commonwealth may require.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 6. Presentation of bills; powers of Governor; vetoes and amendments.

Every bill which passes the Senate and House of Delegates, before it becomes law, shall be presented to the Governor.

During a regular or special session, the Governor shall have seven days in which to act on the bill after it is presented to him and to exercise one of the three options set out below. If the Governor does not act on the bill, it shall become law without his signature.

The Governor may sign the bill if he approves it, and the bill shall become law.

The Governor may veto the bill if he objects to it by returning the bill with his objections to the house in which the bill originated. The house shall enter the objections in its journal and reconsider the bill. The house may override the veto by a two-thirds vote of the members present, which two-thirds shall include a majority of the members elected to that house. If the house of origin overrides the Governor’s veto, it shall send the bill and Governor’s objections to the other house where the bill shall be reconsidered. The second house may override the Governor’s veto by a two-thirds vote of the members present, which two-thirds shall include a majority of the members elected to that house. If both houses override the Governor’s veto, the bill shall become law without his signature. If either house fails to override the Governor’s veto, the veto shall stand and the bill shall not become law.

The Governor may recommend one or more specific and severable amendments to a bill by returning it with his recommendation to the house in which it originated. The house shall enter the Governor’s recommendation in its journal and reconsider the bill. If both houses agree to the Governor’s entire recommendation, the bill, as amended, shall become law. Each house may agree to the Governor’s amendments by a majority vote of the members present. If both houses agree to the bill in the form originally sent to the Governor by a two-thirds vote of all members present in each house, which two-thirds shall include a majority of the members elected to that house, the original bill shall become law. If the Governor sends down specific and severable amendments then each house may determine, in accordance with its own procedures, whether to act on the Governor’s amendments en bloc or individually, or any combination thereof. If the house of origin agrees to one or more of the Governor’s amendments, it shall send the bill and the entire recommendation to the other house. The second house may also agree to one or more of the Governor’s amendments. If either house fails to agree to the Governor’s entire recommendation or fails to agree to at least one of the Governor’s amendments agreed to by the other house, the bill, as originally presented to the Governor, shall be returned to the Governor. If both houses agree to one or more amendments but not to the entire recommendation of the Governor, the bill shall be reenrolled with the Governor’s amendments agreed to by both houses and shall be returned to the Governor. If the Governor fails to send down specific and severable amendments as determined by the majority vote of the members present in either house, then the bill shall be before that house, in the form originally sent to the Governor and may be acted upon in accordance with Article IV, Section 11 of this Constitution and returned to the Governor. The Governor shall either sign or veto a bill returned as provided in this subsection or, if there are fewer than seven days remaining in the session, as provided in subsection (c).

When there are fewer than seven days remaining in the regular or special session from the date a bill is presented to the Governor and the General Assembly adjourns to a reconvened session, the Governor shall have thirty days from the date of adjournment of the regular or special session in which to act on the bills presented to him and to exercise one of the three options set out below. If the Governor does not act on any bill, it shall become law without his signature.

The Governor may sign the bill if he approves it, and the bill shall become law.

The Governor may veto the bill if he objects to it by returning the bill with his objections to the house in which the bill originated. The same procedures for overriding his veto are applicable as stated in subsection (b) for bills vetoed during the session.

The Governor may recommend one or more specific and severable amendments to a bill by returning it with his recommendation to the house in which it originated. The same procedures for considering his recommendation are applicable as stated in subsection (b)(iii) for bills returned with his recommendation. The Governor shall either sign or veto a bill returned to him from a reconvened session. If the Governor vetoes the bill, the veto shall stand and the bill shall not become law. If the Governor does not act on the bill within thirty days after the adjournment of the reconvened session, the bill shall become law without his signature.

The Governor shall have the power to veto any particular item or items of an appropriation bill, but the veto shall not affect the item or items to which he does not object. The item or items objected to shall not take effect except in the manner provided in this section for a bill vetoed by the Governor.

In all cases set forth above, the names of the members voting for and against the bill, the amendment or amendments to the bill, or the item or items of an appropriation bill shall be entered on the journal of each house.

Amendment ratified Nov. 8, 1994. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1993 Session (Act 1993, c. 893) and the 1994 Session (Acts 1994, cc. 770 and 817), and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 8, 1994. The amendment, effective January 1, 1995, rewrote the section.

Amendment ratified Nov. 4, 1980. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1979 Session (Acts 1979, c. 742) and the 1980 Session (Acts 1980, cc. 636, 763) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1980. The amendment added the provisos at the end of the third sentence of the first paragraph and at the end of the third paragraph, and, in the last paragraph, substituted “adjournment from a regular or special session, pending a reconvened session” for “final adjournment” and “such adjournment” for “adjournment, but not otherwise” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Proposed amendment not submitted to voters. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1977 Session (Acts 1977, c. 688), and referred to the 1978 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1978, cc. 806, 852). The 1978 act agreeing to the amendment was held unconstitutional by the State Supreme Court, because it did not include an amendment to Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13, also agreed to in Acts 1977, c. 688, and the amendment to this section was therefore not submitted to the people.

Law Review.

For survey of constitutional law for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1385 (1977).

For article, “Legislative and Executive Veto of Rules of Administrative Agencies: Models and Alternatives,” see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 79 (1982).

For annual survey of Virginia law, “Election Law and Government Ethics,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law, “Comment: Why Virginia’s Challenges to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act Did Not Invoke Nullification,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 917 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
17 M.J. Statutes, §§ 19, 20.

§ 7. Executive and administrative powers.

The Governor shall take care that the laws be faithfully executed.

The Governor shall be commander-in-chief of the armed forces of the Commonwealth and shall have power to embody such forces to repel invasion, suppress insurrection, and enforce the execution of the laws.

The Governor shall conduct, either in person or in such manner as shall be prescribed by law, all intercourse with other and foreign states.

The Governor shall have power to fill vacancies in all offices of the Commonwealth for the filling of which the Constitution and laws make no other provision. If such office be one filled by the election of the people, the appointee shall hold office until the next general election, and thereafter until his successor qualifies, according to law. The General Assembly shall, if it is in session, fill vacancies in all offices which are filled by election by that body.

Gubernatorial appointments to fill vacancies in offices which are filled by election by the General Assembly or by appointment by the Governor which is subject to confirmation by the Senate or the General Assembly, made during the recess of the General Assembly, shall expire at the end of thirty days after the commencement of the next session of the General Assembly.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
9A M.J. Governor, § 4;
12B M.J. Military, §§ 8, 9.

§ 8. Information from administrative officers.

The Governor may require information in writing, under oath, from any officer of any executive or administrative department, office, or agency, or any public institution upon any subject relating to their respective departments, offices, agencies, or public institutions; and he may inspect at any time their official books, accounts, and vouchers, and ascertain the conditions of the public funds in their charge, and in that connection may employ accountants. He may require the opinion in writing of the Attorney General upon any question of law affecting the official duties of the Governor.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions concerning Governor’s power to require information from other state officers, see §§

2.2-109

,

2.2-110

, and

2.2-505

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Suspension of regulations. —

The Virginia Constitution prohibits the Governor from unilaterally suspending the operation of regulations that have the force of law. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, No. 13-109, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/3/14).

§ 9. Administrative organization.

The functions, powers, and duties of the administrative departments and divisions and of the agencies of the Commonwealth within the legislative and executive branches may be prescribed by law.

§ 10. Appointment and removal of administrative officers.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this Constitution, the Governor shall appoint each officer serving as the head of an administrative department or division of the executive branch of the government, subject to such confirmation as the General Assembly may prescribe. Each officer appointed by the Governor pursuant to this section shall have such professional qualifications as may be prescribed by law and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

§ 11. Effect of refusal of General Assembly to confirm an appointment by the Governor.

No person appointed to any office by the Governor, whose appointment is subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, under the provisions of this Constitution or any statute, shall enter upon, or continue in, office after the General Assembly shall have refused to confirm his appointment, nor shall such person be eligible for reappointment during the recess of the General Assembly to fill the vacancy caused by such refusal to confirm.

§ 12. Executive clemency.

The Governor shall have power to remit fines and penalties under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by law; to grant reprieves and pardons after conviction except when the prosecution has been carried on by the House of Delegates; to remove political disabilities consequent upon conviction for offenses committed prior or subsequent to the adoption of this Constitution; and to commute capital punishment.

He shall communicate to the General Assembly, at each regular session, particulars of every case of fine or penalty remitted, of reprieve or pardon granted, and of punishment commuted, with his reasons for remitting, granting, or commuting the same.

Law Review.

For note on pardons in Virginia, see 26 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 307 (1969).

For note on due process aspects relating to revocation of pardon, see 33 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 569 (1976).

For note, “The Clemency Process in Virginia”, see 27 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1993).

For note, “A Jury of One’s Peers: Virginia’s Restoration of Rights Process and Its Disproportionate Effect on the African American Community,” see 46 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2109 (2005).

For comment, “Lifting the Fog: Ending Felony Disenfranchisement in Virginia,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 471 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 92;
14A M.J. Pardon, Probation and Parole, §§ 4, 5;
17 M.J. Statutes, § 27;
20 M.J. Weapons, § 4.1.

§ 13. Lieutenant Governor; election and qualifications.

A Lieutenant Governor shall be elected at the same time and for the same term as the Governor, and his qualifications and the manner and ascertainment of his election, in all respects, shall be the same, except that there shall be no limit on the terms of the Lieutenant Governor.

Cross references.

As to election and term of office of Lieutenant Governor, see §

24.2-210

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
9A M.J. Governor, § 2.

§ 14. Duties and compensation of Lieutenant Governor.

The Lieutenant Governor shall be President of the Senate but shall have no vote except in case of an equal division. He shall receive for his services a compensation to be prescribed by law, which shall not be increased nor diminished during the period for which he shall have been elected.

Cross references.

As to salaries of members and presiding officers of the General Assembly, see §§ 30-19.11, 30-19.12.

§ 15. Attorney General.

An Attorney General shall be elected by the qualified voters of the Commonwealth at the same time and for the same term as the Governor; and the fact of his election shall be ascertained in the same manner. No person shall be eligible for election or appointment to the office of Attorney General unless he is a citizen of the United States, has attained the age of thirty years, and has the qualifications required for a judge of a court of record. He shall perform such duties and receive such compensation as may be prescribed by law, which compensation shall neither be increased nor diminished during the period for which he shall have been elected. There shall be no limit on the terms of the Attorney General.

Cross references.

As to duties and powers of Attorney General, see §

2.2-500

et seq.

As to election and term of office of Attorney General, see §

24.2-210

.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Administrative Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
2A M.J. Attorney General, § 3.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Attorney General employees not covered by Virginia Personnel Act. —

Virginia Personnel Act, §

2.2-2400

et seq., exempted from coverage officers and employees for whom the constitution directed the manner of selection; this included the attorney general and, derivatively, any of his appointed employees, and, thus, those employees were ineligible for severance benefits under the Worker Transition Act, §

2.2-3203

et seq. Boynton v. Kilgore, 69 Va. Cir. 5, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 354 (Richmond Jan. 28, 2005), aff'd,

271 Va. 220

, 623 S.E.2d 922, 2006 Va. LEXIS 2 (2006).

§ 16. Succession to the office of Governor.

When the Governor-elect is disqualified, resigns, or dies following his election but prior to taking office, the Lieutenant Governor-elect shall succeed to the office of Governor for the full term. When the Governor-elect fails to assume office for any other reason, the Lieutenant Governor-elect shall serve as Acting Governor.

Whenever the Governor transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Delegates his written declaration that he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office and until he transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties shall be discharged by the Lieutenant Governor as Acting Governor.

Whenever the Attorney General, the President pro tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Delegates, or a majority of the total membership of the General Assembly, transmit to the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates their written declaration that the Governor is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Lieutenant Governor shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting Governor.

Thereafter, when the Governor transmits to the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates his written declaration that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his office unless the Attorney General, the President pro tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Delegates, or a majority of the total membership of the General Assembly, transmit within four days to the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates their written declaration that the Governor is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon the General Assembly shall decide the issue, convening within forty-eight hours for that purpose if not already in session. If within twenty-one days after receipt of the latter declaration or, if the General Assembly is not in session, within twenty-one days after the General Assembly is required to convene, the General Assembly determines by three-fourths vote of the elected membership of each house of the General Assembly that the Governor is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Lieutenant Governor shall become Governor; otherwise, the Governor shall resume the powers and duties of his office.

In the case of the removal of the Governor from office or in the case of his disqualification, death, or resignation, the Lieutenant Governor shall become Governor.

If a vacancy exists in the office of Lieutenant Governor when the Lieutenant Governor is to succeed to the office of Governor or to serve as Acting Governor, the Attorney General, if he is eligible to serve as Governor, shall succeed to the office of Governor for the unexpired term or serve as Acting Governor. If the Attorney General is ineligible to serve as Governor, the Speaker of the House of Delegates, if he is eligible to serve as Governor, shall succeed to the office of Governor for the unexpired term or serve as Acting Governor. If a vacancy exists in the office of the Speaker of the House of Delegates or if the Speaker of the House of Delegates is ineligible to serve as Governor, the House of Delegates shall convene and fill the vacancy.

In the event of an emergency or enemy attack upon the soil of Virginia and a resulting inability of the House of Delegates to convene to fill the vacancy, the Speaker of the House, the person designated to act in his stead as prescribed in the Rules of the House of Delegates, the President pro tempore of the Senate, or the majority leader of the Senate, in that designated order, shall serve as Acting Governor until such time as the House of Delegates convenes to elect a Governor.

The General Assembly may provide by law for the waiver of the eligibility requirements for the Attorney General, Speaker of the House, or acting Speaker to serve as Governor or Acting Governor in the event of an emergency or enemy attack upon the soil of Virginia as evidenced by a proclamation of the Governor or alternative authority prescribed by law.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions concerning discharge of duties when offices of Governor and Lieutenant Governor are vacant, see §§

24.2-211

,

24.2-212

.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 2004. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2003 Session (Acts 2003, c. 959) and the 2004 Session (Acts 2004, cc. 17 and 982) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 2, 2004. The amendment, effective January 1, 2005, added the last two paragraphs.

Law Review.

For survey of election law reform in Virginia, see 12 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 333 (1970).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
9A M.J. Governor, § 3.

§ 17. Commissions and grants.

Commissions and grants shall run in the name of the Commonwealth of Virginia, and be attested by the Governor, with the seal of the Commonwealth annexed.

Cross references.

As to affixing seal to commissions and grants, see §

1-504

.